Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TURNING POINT INC.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Turning Point Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip a 32-bed residential facility to be known as "Ms. Bea's" in the metropolitan area, as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. This appropriation includes money for major projects to preserve or replace mechanical, electrical, plumbing, HVAC, and life safety systems; renovation and construction of space for bedrooms, a commercial kitchen, indoor recreation, bathrooms, a workforce development and resource room, and community common areas; upgrades to achieve compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA); and site improvements that prepare the space for future expansion. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end